Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.130

Leaves of absence—Notice—Filling vacancy.

Leave of absence, without pay, may be granted by any appointing power to any person under civil service: PROVIDED, That such appointing power shall give notice of such leave to the commission. All temporary employment caused by leaves of absence shall be made from the eligible list of the classified civil service.

[ 1935 c 31 s 14; RRS s 9558-14.]